Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB73.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217.015 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 217.005 to 217.215:
(1) "Advertisement" means all representations, disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by
labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food,
drugs, devices, or cosmetics;
(2) "Bread" and "enriched bread" mean only the foods commonly known and described as white bread, white
rolls, white buns, enriched white bread, enriched rolls, and enriched white buns, as defined under the federal
act. For the purposes of KRS 217.136 and 217.137, "bread" or "enriched bread" also means breads that may
include vegetables or fruit as an ingredient;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or its designee;
(4) "Color" means but is not limited to black, white, and intermediate grays;
(5) "Color additive" means a material that:
(a) Is a dye, pigment, or other substance made by a process of synthesis or similar artifice, or extracted,
isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without intermediate or final change of identity, from a
vegetable, animal, mineral, or other source. [Nothing in ]This paragraph shall not be construed to apply
to any pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely because of its
effect in aiding, retarding, or otherwise affecting, directly or indirectly, the growth or other natural
physiological process of produce of the soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after
harvest; or
(b) When added or applied to a food, drug, or cosmetic, or to the human body or any part thereof, is
capable, alone or through reaction with another substance, of imparting color. "Color additive" does not
include any material that has been or may in the future be exempted under the federal act;
(6) "Contaminated with filth" means any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is not securely protected from dust,
dirt, and as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contaminants;
(7) "Cosmetic" means:
(a) Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to
the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the
appearance; and
(b) Articles intended for use as a component of those articles, except that the term shall not include soap;
(8) "Device," except when used in subsection (48) of this section, KRS 217.035(6), KRS 217.065(3), KRS
217.095(3), and KRS 217.175(10), means instruments, apparatus, and contrivances, including their
components, parts, and accessories, intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals;
or
(b) To affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals;
(9) "Dispense" means to deliver a drug or device to an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the
lawful order of a practitioner, including the packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the
substance for that delivery;
(10) "Dispenser" means a person who lawfully dispenses a drug or device to or for the use of an ultimate user;
(11) "Drug" means:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Articles recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of
the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or
other animals;
(c) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other
animals; and
(d) Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in this subsection but does not include
devices or their components, parts, or accessories;
(12) "Enriched," as applied to flour, means the addition to flour of vitamins and other nutritional ingredients
necessary to make it conform to the definition and standard of enriched flour as defined under the federal act;
(13) "Environmental Pesticide Control Act of 1972" means the Federal Environmental Pesticide Control Act of
1972, Pub. L. 92-516, and all amendments thereto;
(14) "Fair Packaging and Labeling Act" means the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act as it relates to foods and
cosmetics, 15 U.S.C. secs. 1451 et seq., and all amendments thereto;
(15) "Federal act" means the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. secs. 301 et seq., 52 Stat. 1040 et
seq., or amendments thereto;
(16) "Filled milk" means any milk, cream, or skimmed milk, whether or not condensed, evaporated, concentrated,
frozen, powdered, dried, or desiccated, to which has been added, or which has been blended or compounded
with, any fat or oil other than milk fat, except the fat or oil of contained eggs and nuts and the fat or oil of
substances used for flavoring purposes only, so that the resulting product is an imitation or semblance of milk,
cream, skimmed milk, ice cream mix, ice cream, or frozen desserts, whether or not condensed, evaporated,
concentrated, frozen, powdered, dried, or desiccated, whether in bulk or in containers, hermetically sealed or
unsealed. This definition does not mean or include any milk or cream from which no part of the milk or butter
fat has been extracted, whether or not condensed, evaporated, concentrated, powdered, dried, or desiccated, to
which has been added any substance rich in vitamins, nor any distinctive proprietary food compound not
readily mistaken for milk or cream or for condensed, evaporated, concentrated, powdered, dried, or desiccated
milk or cream, if the compound is prepared and designed for the feeding of infants or young children, sick or
infirm persons, and customarily used on the order of a physician, and is packed in individual containers
bearing a label in bold type that the contents are to be used for those purposes; nor shall this definition prevent
the use, blending, or compounding of chocolate as a flavor with milk, cream, or skimmed milk, desiccated,
whether in bulk or in containers, hermetically sealed or unsealed, to or with which has been added, blended or
compounded no other fat or oil other than milk or butter fat;
(17) "Flour" means only the foods commonly known as flour, white flour, wheat flour, plain flour, bromated flour,
self-rising flour, self-rising white flour, self-rising wheat flour, phosphated flour, phosphated white flour, and
phosphated wheat flour, defined under the federal act;
(18) "Food" means:
(a) Articles used for food or drink for man or other animals;
(b) Chewing gum; and
(c) Articles used for components of any such article;
(19) "Food additive" means any substance the intended use of which results or may be reasonably expected to
result, directly or indirectly, in its becoming a component or otherwise affecting the characteristics of any
food, including any substance intended for use in producing, manufacturing, packing, processing, preparing,
treating, packaging, transporting, or holding food; and including any source of radiation intended for any of
these uses, if the substance is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and
experience to evaluate its safety, as having been adequately shown through scientific procedures or, in the case
of a substance used in a food prior to January 1, 1958, through either scientific procedures or experience based
on common use in food to be safe under the conditions of its intended use; except that the term does not
include:
(a) A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity;
(b) A pesticide chemical to the extent that it is intended for use or is used in the production, storage, or
transportation of any raw agricultural commodity;

CHAPTER 52 3
(c) A color additive; or
(d) Any substance used in accordance with a sanction or approval granted prior to the enactment of the
Food Additives Amendment of 1958, pursuant to the federal act; the Poultry Products Inspection Act,
21 U.S.C. secs. 451 et seq.; or the Meat Inspection Act of 1907; and amendments thereto;
(20) "Food processing establishment" means any commercial establishment in which food is manufactured,
processed, or packaged for human consumption, but does not include retail food establishments, home-based
processors, or home-based microprocessors;
(21) "Food service establishment" means any fixed or mobile commercial establishment that engages in the
preparation and serving of ready-to-eat foods in portions to the consumer, including but not limited to:
restaurants; coffee shops; cafeterias; short order cafes; luncheonettes; grills; tea rooms; sandwich shops; soda
fountains; taverns; bars; cocktail lounges; nightclubs; roadside stands; industrial feeding establishments;
private, public or nonprofit organizations or institutions routinely serving food; catering kitchens;
commissaries; charitable food kitchens; or similar places in which food is prepared for sale or service on the
premises or elsewhere with or without charge. It does not include food vending machines, establishments
serving beverages only in single service or original containers, or retail food stores which only cut, slice, and
prepare cold-cut sandwiches for individual consumption;
(22) "Food storage warehouse" means any establishment in which food is stored for subsequent distribution;
(23) "Immediate container" does not include package liners;
(24) "Imminent health hazard" means a significant threat or danger to health that is considered to exist when there
is evidence sufficient to show that a product, practice, circumstance, or event creates a situation that requires
immediate correction or cessation of operation to prevent illness or injury based on:
(a) The number of potential illnesses or injuries; or
(b) The nature, severity, and duration of the anticipated illness or injury;
(25) "Interference" means threatening or otherwise preventing the performance of lawful inspections or duties by
agents of the cabinet during all reasonable times of operation;
(26) "Label" means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article; and
a requirement made by or under authority of KRS 217.005 to 217.215 that any word, statement, or other
information appearing on the label shall not be considered to be complied with unless the word, statement, or
other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if any there be, of the retail package of the
article, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper;
(27) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter:
(a) Upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers; or
(b) Accompanying the article;
(28) "Legend drug" means a drug defined by the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, as amended, and under
which definition its label is required to bear the statement "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without
prescription.";
(29) "Meat Inspection Act" means the Federal Meat Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. secs. 71 et seq., 34 Stat. 1260 et seq.,
including any amendments thereto;
(30) "New drug" means:
(a) Any drug the composition of which is such that the drug is not generally recognized among experts
qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety of drugs as safe for use under the
conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof; or
(b) Any drug the composition of which is such that the drug, as a result of investigations to determine its
safety for use under prescribed conditions, has become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than
in the investigations, been used to a material extent or for a material time under the conditions;
(31) "Official compendium" means the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia
of the United States, official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(32) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, company, corporation, trustee, association, or any public or
private entity;
(33) "Pesticide chemical" means any substance that alone in chemical combination, or in formulation with one or
more other substances, is an "economic poison" within the meaning of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and
Rodenticide Act and amendments thereto, and that is used in the production, storage, or transportation of raw
agricultural commodities;
(34) "Poultry Products Inspection Act" means the Federal Poultry and Poultry Products Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C.
secs. 451 et seq., Pub. L. 85-172, 71 Stat. 441, and any amendments thereto;
(35) "Practitioner" means medical or osteopathic physicians, dentists, chiropodists, and veterinarians who are
licensed under the professional licensing laws of Kentucky to prescribe and administer drugs and devices.
"Practitioner" includes optometrists when administering or prescribing pharmaceutical agents authorized in
KRS 320.240(12) to (14), advanced practice registered nurses as authorized in KRS 314.011 and 314.042,
physician assistants when administering or prescribing pharmaceutical agents as authorized in KRS 311.858,
and health care professionals who are residents of and actively practicing in a state other than Kentucky and
who are licensed and have prescriptive authority under the professional licensing laws of another state, unless
the person's Kentucky license has been revoked, suspended, restricted, or probated, in which case the terms of
the Kentucky license shall prevail;
(36) "Prescription" means a written or oral order for a drug or medicine, or combination or mixture of drugs or
medicines, or proprietary preparation, that is signed, given, or authorized by a medical, advanced practice
registered nurse, dental, chiropody, veterinarian, or optometric practitioner, and intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals;
(37) "Prescription blank" means a document that conforms with KRS 217.216 and is intended for prescribing a
drug to an ultimate user;
(38) "Raw agricultural commodity" means any food in its raw or natural state, including all fruits that are washed,
colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form prior to marketing;
(39) "Retail food establishment" means any food service establishment, retail food store, or a combination of both
within the same establishment;
(40) "Retail food store" means any fixed or mobile establishment where food or food products, including
prepackaged, labeled sandwiches or other foods to be heated in a microwave or infrared oven at the time of
purchase, are offered for sale to the consumer, and intended for off-premises consumption, but does not
include establishments which handle only prepackaged, snack-type, nonpotentially hazardous foods, markets
that offer only fresh fruits and vegetables for sale, food service establishments, food and beverage vending
machines, vending machine commissaries, food processing establishments, or home-based processors;
(41) "Salvage distributor" means a person who engages in the business of distributing, peddling, or otherwise
trafficking in any salvaged merchandise;
(42) "Salvage processing plant" means an establishment operated by a person engaged in the business of
reconditioning, labeling, relabeling, repackaging, recoopering, sorting, cleaning, culling or who by other
means salvages, sells, offers for sale, or distributes for human or animal consumption or use any salvaged
food, beverage, including beer, wine and distilled spirits, vitamins, food supplements, dentifices, cosmetics,
single-service food containers or utensils, containers and packaging materials used for foods and cosmetics,
soda straws, paper napkins, or any other product of a similar nature that has been damaged or contaminated by
fire, water, smoke, chemicals, transit, or by any other means;
(43) "Second or subsequent offense" has the same meaning as it does in KRS 218A.010;
(44) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(45) "Temporary food service establishment" means any food service establishment which operates at a fixed
location for a period of time, not to exceed fourteen (14) consecutive days;
(46) "Traffic" has the same meaning as it does in KRS 218A.010;
(47) "Ultimate user" has the same meaning as it does in KRS 218A.010;
(48) If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is alleged to
be false because it is misleading, in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading, there
shall be taken into account, among other things, not only representations made or suggested by statement,

CHAPTER 52 5
word, design, device, sound, or in any combination thereof, but also the extent to which the labeling or
advertisement fails to reveal facts that are material in the light of the representations or material with respect to
consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under
the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under the conditions of use as are
customary or usual;
(49) The representation of a drug in its labeling or advertisement as an antiseptic shall be considered to be a
representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be, or represented as, an
antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or other use involving prolonged
contact with the body;
(50) The provisions of KRS 217.005 to 217.215 regarding the selling of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics shall be
considered to include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and
holding of those articles for sale, the sale, dispensing, and giving of those articles, and the supplying or
applying of those articles in the conduct of any food, drug, or cosmetic establishment;
(51) "Home" means a primary residence occupied by the processor, that contains only two (2) ranges, ovens, or
double-ovens, and no more than three (3) refrigerators used for cold storage. This equipment shall have been
designed for home use and not for commercial use, and shall be operated in the kitchen within the residence;
(52) "Formulated acid food product" means an acid food in which the addition of a small amount of low-acid food
results in a finished equilibrium pH of 4.6 or below that does not significantly differ from that of the
predominant acid or acid food;
(53) "Acidified food product" means a low-acid food to which acid or acidic food is added and which has a water
activity value greater than 0.85, and a finished equilibrium pH of 4.6 or below;
(54) "Low-acid food" means foods, other than alcoholic beverages, with a finished equilibrium pH greater than 4.6,
and a water activity value greater than 0.85;
(55) "Acid food" means foods that have a natural pH of 4.6 or below;
(56) "Home-based processor" means a person who in his or her home, produces or processes pork lard or tallow-
based cosmetic products or non-potentially hazardous foods, including but not limited to dried herbs, spices,
nuts, candy, dried grains, whole fruit and vegetables, mixed-greens, jams, jellies, sweet sorghum syrup,
preserves, fruit butter, bread, fruit pies, cakes, or cookies, and who has a gross income of no more than sixty
thousand dollars ($60,000) annually from the sale of the products;
(57) "Home-based microprocessor" means a farmer who, in the farmer's home or certified or permitted kitchen,
produces or processes foods, including but not limited to acid foods, formulated acid food products, acidified
food products, or low-acid canned foods, and who has a gross income of no more than sixty thousand dollars
($60,000) annually from the sale of the product;
(58) "Certified" means any person or home-based microprocessor who:
(a) Has attended the Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service's microprocessing program or pilot
microprocessing program and has been identified by the Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service as
having satisfactorily completed the prescribed course of instruction; or
(b) Has attended some other school pursuant to 21 C.F.R. sec. 114.10;
(59) "Farmer" means a person who is a resident of Kentucky and owns or rents agricultural land pursuant to
subsection (9) of KRS 132.010 or horticultural land pursuant to subsection (10) of KRS 132.010. For the
purposes of KRS 217.136 to 217.139, "farmer" also means any person who is a resident of Kentucky and has
grown the primary horticultural and agronomic ingredients used in the home-based microprocessed products
which they have produced; and
(60) "Farmers market temporary food service establishment" means any temporary food service establishment
operated by a farmer who is a member of the market which operates within the confines of a farmers market
registered with the Kentucky Department of Agriculture for the direct-to-consumer marketing of Kentucky-
grown farm products from approved sources for a period of time not to exceed two (2) days per week for any
consecutive six (6) months period in a calendar year.
Section 2. KRS 217.136 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) A home-based processor shall be exempt from KRS 217.035, [and ]217.037, and 217.095 if the following
conditions are met:
(a) All finished product containers are clean, sanitary, and properly labeled pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section;
(b) All home-processed foods or pork lard or tallow-based cosmetic products produced under this
exemption are neither adulterated nor misbranded pursuant to subsection (4) of this section; and
(c) All glass containers for jams, jellies, preserves, fruit butter, and similar products are provided with
suitable rigid metal covers.
(2) A home-based processor shall not produce or process for sale acid foods, acidified food products, formulated
acid food products, or low-acid canned foods.
(3) A home-based processor shall label each of its food or cosmetic products and include the following
information on the label of each of its food or cosmetic products:
(a) The name and address of the home-based processing operation;
(b) The common or usual name of the food or cosmetic product;
(c) The ingredients of the food or cosmetic product, in descending order of predominance by weight;
(d) The net weight and volume of the food or cosmetic product by standard measure, or numerical count;
(e) The following statement in ten (10) point type: "This product is home-produced and processed"; and
(f) The date the product was processed.
(4) Food or cosmetic products identified in KRS 217.015(56) and not labeled in accordance with subsection (3) of
this section are deemed misbranded.
(5) Food or cosmetic products identified in KRS 217.015(56) and produced, processed, and labeled in accordance
with subsection (3) of this section are acceptable food or cosmetic products that may only be offered for sale
directly to consumers within this state, including from the home-based processor's home, whether by pick-up
or delivery, at a market, roadside stand, community event, or online. These food products may be used in
preparing and serving food.
(6) Food products identified in KRS 217.015(56) and labeled in accordance with subsection (3) of this section
shall not be required to be tested in determining whether or not the food product is an acid food, acidified food
product, formulated acid food product, or low-acid food.
(7) The processing facilities of a home-based processor may be inspected annually by the cabinet.
(8) A home-based processor shall be subject to product[food] sampling and inspection if it is determined that its
[food ]product is misbranded pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or adulterated, or if a consumer
complaint has been received.
(9) If the cabinet has reason to believe that an imminent health hazard exists it may invoke cessation of production
until it deems that the hazardous situation has been addressed to the satisfaction of the cabinet.
(10) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to further delineate which food or cosmetic products
are subject to the definition of home-based processor, as defined in KRS 217.015(56).
(11) [No later than January 1, 2020, the cabinet shall develop and implement a registration system for home-based
processors.
(12) Beginning January 1, 2020, ]A home-based processor shall be registered with the cabinet and include the
following information:
(a) The name of the home-based processor and the physical address where production or processing will
occur; and
(b) A listing of the food or cosmetic products to be produced or processed.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 217.005 TO 217.215 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "end consumer" means a person who is the last person to purchase any
food product and who does not resell the food product.

CHAPTER 52 7
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the secretary shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Exclude slaughtering and processing of poultry on a farm for the purpose of conducting sales under
9 C.F.R. sec. 381.10 if the slaughtered and processed poultry or poultry products are sold to an end
consumer on a farm, at a farmers market, or at a roadside stand;
(b) Require that poultry or poultry products processed under this section that are sold on a farm be
refrigerated at the point of sale and labeled in compliance with the requirements of 9 C.F.R. sec.
381.10; and
(c) Require that poultry or poultry products processed under this section that are sold at a farmers
market or at a roadside stand be frozen at the point of sale and labeled in compliance with the
requirements of 9 C.F.R. sec. 381.10.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, a local governmental agency shall not require
any additional certification or inspection of poultry or poultry products of a farmer acting in compliance
with the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.
Section 4. KRS 258.265 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An owner shall exercise proper care and control of his or her dog to prevent the dog from violating any local
government nuisance ordinance.
(2) Any peace officer or animal control officer may seize or destroy any dog found running at large between the
hours of sunset and sunrise,[ and] unaccompanied, and not under the control of its owner or handler. A peace
officer or animal control officer shall be under a duty to make a fair and reasonable effort to determine
whether any dog found at large between sunset and sunrise is a working livestock dog, hound, or other hunting
dog which has become lost temporarily from a pack or wandered from immediate control of its owner[,] or
handler, and if he or she is reasonably sure that the dog is a working livestock dog or hunting dog, then he or
she shall not destroy the dog[,] unless it is found in the act of pursuing or wounding livestock, [or] wounding
or killing poultry, or attacking human beings.
(3) A working livestock dog, hound, or hunting dog may be unrestrained when engaged in lawful working or
hunting activities while on private or public property designated or authorized for that purpose.
Section 5. KRS 259.120 is amended to read as follows:
Stray equines and stray cattle shall be taken up and posted in the following manner:
(1) (a) Documentation of stray equines shall be taken before a county judge/executive of the district, who shall
administer to the taker-up an oath, in substance, that the equine was taken up by him or her as a stray
and that he or she has not defaced or altered the marks, brands, or other identifiers, including but not
limited to microchips or freeze brands, of the equine.
(b) Documentation of stray cattle shall be taken before a county judge/executive of the district, who shall
administer to the taker-up an oath, in substance that the cattle were taken by him or her as strays on his
or her premises within the preceding ten (10) days and that he or she has not defaced or altered the
marks or brands of the cattle.
(c) Duties of the county judge/executive pertaining to stray equines shall be to:
1. Contract with a licensed veterinarian, who shall document the stray equine's breed, color, sex,
marks, brands, scars, and other distinguishing features, perform a microchip scan, and identify
the existence of lip tattoos, freeze brands, or microchips;
2. Record the veterinarian's findings, the name and residence of the taker-up, and the location of the
stray equine in a book to be kept by him or her for that purpose;
3. Maintain documentation in electronic and paper format; and
4. Send a copy of the documentation of the stray equine to the Office of [the ]State Veterinarian,
who shall post notification on the Office of [the ]State Veterinarian's website[Web site]. The
Office of[ the] State Veterinarian shall post one (1) photograph of the stray equine's front view,
including its head and feet, and one (1) photograph of the stray equine's side view from muzzle
to tail.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Pertaining to stray equines, the county judge/executive:
1. May contract, subject to approval by the county legislative body, with one (1) or more 501
(c)(3) organizations that provide animal sheltering services to perform those duties listed
under this subsection and subsection (2) of this section in lieu of the county judge/executive;
and
2. Shall be immune from criminal liability and civil liability under KRS 259.140 for any
discretionary act related to the taking up and posting of stray equines, including but not
limited to any care, treatment, or population control measures, including
immunocontraception, related to the equines that are taken up;
(2) The county judge/executive shall give to the taker-up a copy of the documentation for the record and
immediately deliver to the county clerk a certified copy of the same record;
(3) The clerk shall immediately record the stray certificate of the county judge/executive as provided by the taker-
up in a book to be kept by him or her for that purpose;
(4) The taker-up shall immediately post a copy of the county judge/executive's certificate in the sheriff's office
with jurisdiction over the area where the stray cattle or stray equine was taken up after he or she has posted the
stray. Hold time for stray equines shall begin after all documentation has been properly filed and posted by the
county judge/executive and taker-up; and
(5) (a) If ownership is found from identifiers of the stray equine such as lip tattoos, freeze brands, or
microchips, efforts shall be made by the county/judge executive or his or her designee to ascertain the
owner by investigatory due diligence in locating the owner and providing notice before holding time
expires. The owner/claimants of the stray equine shall reimburse the county judge/executive for the cost
of the veterinarian's assessment per the contracted agreement.
(b) The taker-up shall be paid by the owner of the stray, if and when he or she claims the stray or its value,
the actual itemized costs incurred by the taker-up for keeping the stray equine or cattle. In the event that
a dispute arises relating to ownership, adverse claimants, third-party claims or liens, value of the equine,
or actual itemized expenses incurred, the parties may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction
of the county in which the stray equine was taken up. The filing of an action under this paragraph shall
toll holding time as to vesting of ownership interests.
(c) The taker-up may have the stray equine sterilized only after the fifteen (15) day holding period has
expired and ownership vested pursuant to KRS 259.130, and any pending court cases pertaining to the
stray equine have been resolved.
Became law without Governor's signature April 8, 2026.